Illinois, session 104th, SB2978.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-80-13 and by adding Section 11-80-26 as 6follows: 7    (65 ILCS 5/11-80-13)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-80-13)8    Sec. 11-80-13. The corporate authorities of each 9municipality may regulate the use of sidewalks, the 10construction, repair, and use of openings in sidewalks, and 11all vaults and structures thereon and thereunder, including 12telephone booths, and may require the owner or occupant of any 13premises to keep the sidewalks abutting the premises 14maintained in reasonable condition, including keeping the 15sidewalk free from snow and other obstructions and making 16repairs as needed.17(Source: Laws 1963, p. 2430.) 18    (65 ILCS 5/11-80-26 new)19    Sec. 11-80-26. Parkways.20    (a) As used in this Section, "parkway" means the portion 21of a public right-of-way between the curb of a street and the 22property line of private or public property, where a sidewalk   SB2978- 2 -LRB104 17937 TRT 31374 b1is often located.2    (b) The corporate authorities of a municipality may 3regulate the use and maintenance of a parkway and may require 4the owner, lessee, and occupant of a property that abuts a 5parkway to be responsible for maintenance of the parkway, 6including, but not limited to, cleanup and disposal of refuse, 7waste, and garbage in the parkway; watering and fertilizing 8plants, trees, and grasses in the parkway; and the routine 9care of the lawn of the parkway, including, but not limited to, 10watering, weeding, and mowing of the lawn of the parkway.